Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2312
Nurse practitioner, defined.

Nurse practitioner means a registered nurse certified as described in section 38-2317 and licensed under the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act to practice as a nurse practitioner.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 14;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 29;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 49;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1707;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 804.

Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-201.